Utah statutes.
77-32a-7.   Default in payment as contempt -- Order to show cause -- Warrant of arrest.

When a defendant sentenced to pay costs defaults in the payment thereof or of any installment, the court on motion of the attorney general or the county attorney or upon its own motion may require him to show cause why his default should not be treated as contempt of court, and may issue an order to show cause or a warrant of arrest for his appearance.

